patterns/hyph_la_liturgical.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
.a3b3æq
.a1
.a1b
.abæ1
.a2b1ali1
.a1ba1
.aba1l
.a2b1au1u1
.aba2u1
.a2b3c
.a2b1eo1
.abe1
.á2b1eo1
.á1
.á1b
.ábe1
.a2b1e1r
.a2b1é1r
.abé1
.a4b3e1s
.a2b1eu1
.a2b1e5ú1
.a2b1éu1
.a2bfu1
.ab1f
.a2b1í1
.a2b1i1c
.abi1
.a2b1i2e1c
.abie1
.a2b1i2é1c
.abié1
.a2b3ie1r
.a2b3ié1r
.a2b1i1g
.á2b3i1g
.ábi1
.a2b1i2i1
.a2b1i2í1
.á2b1i2i1
.a2b1i1n1
.a2b1i1r
.a2b1i1t
.á2b1i1t
.a2b1i4u1
.a2b1i4ú1
.a2b1i1v
.a2b1j
.a2b3l
.á2b3lu1
.áb2l
.a2b1o1l
.abo1
.a2b1ó1l
.abó1
.a2b1o1m
.a2b1o1r
.a2b1ó1r
.a2b1o2r1t
.a2b3r
.á2b3r
.a3b4ra1h
.abra1
.á3b4ra1h
.ábra1
.a2b3ru1
.ab4s3c
.a2b1s
.áb4s3c
.á2b1s
.ab5s4ce1
.ab5s4cé1
.ab5s4ci1
.ab5s4cí1
.ab5s4ci1s
.ab5s4ci1n
.ab5s4cí1n
.ab3s2e1n
.abse1
.ab3s2é1n
.absé1
.ab3si2
.ab5s4i3d
.áb5s4i3d
.ábsi1
.ab5si3l
.ab5si3m
.ab3so1
.ab3só1
.ab5s4o1n
.ab5s4ó1n
.áb5s4o1n
.ábso1
.ab4s3te1m
.ab4s2t
.abste1
.ab4s3té1m
.absté1
.ab3s2te1n
.ab4s3te1r
.ab4s3té1r
.ab4s3ti1n
.absti1
.ab4s3tí1n
.abstí1
.áb4s3ti1n
.áb4s2t
.ábsti1
.ab4s3t4r
.áb4s3t4r
.ab4s3tu1
.ab4s3tú1
.ab3su2
.ab5su3m
.a2b3u4n1d
.abu1
.abu1n
.a2b3ú4n1d
.abú1
.abú1n
.a2b3u1s
.a2b3u1t
.a2b3ú1t
.a2d3
.á2d3
.a3d4æ1
.a4d5æq
.a3d4a4m.
.a1da1
.ada1m
.a2d3a3s4c6r
.ada1s
.ada2s1c
.a3d4e2p1s
.ade1
.ade1p
.ade1r2
.a2dfu1
.a2d1f
.a1di2a1
.adi1
.ádi2a1
.ádi1
.adi2á1
.a3d4i3a1b
.a3d4i3á1b
.adi2e1
.adi2é1
.adi3eu1
.ad3i2i1
.ad3i2í1
.adi2o1
.ádi2o1
.a3d4i1p
.a3d4í1p
.adí1
.á3d4i1p
.a4d5ipi2s1c
.adipi1
.adipi1s
.a4d5ipí2s1c
.adipí1
.adipí1s
.ad5i4s.
.adi1s
.ad5i4t.
.adi1t
.ad3i2u1
.ad3i2ú1
.ádi2u1
.a4d3ole1
.ado1
.ado1l
.a3d4o1n
.a3d4ó1n
.adó1
.a3d4ra1n
.ad2r
.adra1
.a3d4rá1n
.adrá1
.á3d4ra1n
.ád2r
.ádra1
.ad3s2c6r
.a2d1s
.ad2s1c
.ad3si1
.a2d5s2t
.á2d5s2t4r
.á2d1s
.ád4s1t
.adsu3e1
.adsu1
.a3d4u3a1
.adu1
.a3d4u3á1
.a4d5u1l
.a3d4u2r1n
.adu1r
.a3d4y1
.a3d4ý1
.á3d4y1
.alte3r
.a1l
.a4l1t
.alte1
.alté3r
.alté1
.álte3r
.á1l
.á4l1t
.álte1
.alte4r1c
.alté4r1c
.alte4r1n
.alté4r1n
.alte4r1p
.alté4r1p
.al1te4r1t
.al1te4r3u1t
.alteru1
.al1té4r3u1t
.altéru1
.al1te4r3ú1t
.alterú1
.ani2m3a1d
.a1n
.ani1
.ani1m
.anima1
.anti1
.a2n1t
.a1nti3m2n
.anti1m
.ape3r2u1
.a1p
.ape1
.ape1r
.archi3e1
.a1r
.a2r1c
.arc2h
.archi1
.a3s2c
.a1s
.á3s2c
.á1s
.a3s2p
.á3s2p
.a4s3pi1d
.aspi1
.á4s3pi1d
.áspi1
.a4s3pe1r
.aspe1
.á4s3pe1r
.áspe1
.a5s4pe2r1g
.a5s4pe2r1n
.a5s2t
.a5s4te2r1n
.aste1
.aste1r
.a5s4ti1p
.asti1
.a5s4t4r
.a5s4tu1
.a5s4tú1
.1b2
.beni4a1
.be1
.be1n
.beni1
.béni4a1
.bé1
.bé1n
.béni1
.be4th5l
.be1t
.bet2h4
.bé4th5l
.bé1t
.bét2h4
.1c2
.ce4u.
.ce1
.ceu1
.circu4m1
.ci1
.ci1r
.1ci2r1c
.circu3
.circú4m1
.circú1
.circumi2a1
.ci1rcumi1
.circumi2á1
.circumi2e1
.ci1rcumi2i1
.circumi2í1
.ci1rcumi2n3i4i1
.circumi1n
.circumini1
.circumi2o1
.circu1mi2u1
.circu2m5s4
.circú4m5s4
.ci2s3
.co1e1
.co1
.1co3e2le1c
.coe1l
.coele1
.co3e2li1g
.coeli1
.co3eme1n
.coe1m
.coeme1
.co2e1n
.co3e2r
.co3e2x3
.coex3s2
.co3g2no1s
.co1g
.cog2n
.cogno1
.co3g2nó1s
.cognó1
.co1i1
.co1i2e1
.coi3u1
.co2m3e1d
.co1m
.come1
.co2m3é1d
.comé1
.có2m3e1d
.có1
.có1m
.cóme1
.co2m3e4s.
.come1s
.co2m3i1t
.comi1
.co2m3í1t
.comí1
.có2m3i1t
.cómi1
.co2n1
.có2n1
.co3n2a1
.co3n2á1
.co3n2e1
.co3n2é1
.co3n2i1
.co3n2í1
.coni2a1
.1con3i1c
.coni2e1
.1co6n5i4e1c
.1co6n5i4é1c
.conié1
.co6n3i4i1
.co6n3i4í1
.co4n3i2u1
.co4n3i2ú1
.có4n3i2u1
.cóni1
.co3n2o1
.co3n2ó1
.con3s2c6r
.co2n1s
.1con2s1c
.cón3s2c6r
.có2n1s
.1cón2s1c
.con3s2p2
.cón3s2p2
.con5s4t
.cón5s4t
.co3n2u1
.co3n2ú1
.cu4m5s4c6r
.cu3
.cu1m
.cu2m1s
.1cum2s1c
.cu4s1p
.cu1s
.de1í1
.1d
.de1
.dé1i1
.dé1
.de1i1n
.dei1
.de1í1n
.de1i1t
.depe4r5
.de1p
.depe1
.depé4r5
.depé1
.de3s2c
.de1s
.de3s2p
.dé3s2p
.dé1s
.de3s2q
.de5s2ti1t
.de4s1t
.desti1
.de5s2tí1t
.destí1
.de5s2ti1l
.de5s2tí1l
.de5s2tru1
.dest4r
.de5s2trú1
.dé5s2tru1
.dé4s1t
.dést4r
.de4ute1r
.deu1
.deu1t
.deute1
.di3g2no2s1c
.di1
.di1g
.dig2n
.digno1
.digno1s
.di3i4u1
.di1i1
.di3i4ú1
.di3œ1
.di2r1i1m
.di1r
.diri1
.di2r1í1m
.dirí1
.di4s3
.dí4s3
.dí1
.1di5s4ce1d
.di2s1c
.di3s2ce1
.1di5s4cé1d
.di3s2cé1
.di5s4ce1n
.di5s4cé1n
.di5s4ce1p
.di5s4cé1p
.di5s4ce1r
.di5s4cé1r
.di5s4ce1s
.di5s4cé1s
.1di5s4ci1d
.di3s2ci1
.1di5s4cí1d
.di3s2cí1
.di5s4ci1n
.di5s4cí1n
.di5s4ci1p
.di5s4cí1p
.di5s4ci4s1s
.disci1s
.di5s4cí4s1s
.discí1s
.di5s4ci1t
.dí5s4ci1t
.dí2s1c
.dí3s2ci1
.di5s4c6r
.di6s5cre1
.di6s5cré1
.di6s5cri1m
.discri1
.di6s5crí1m
.discrí1
.di6s5cru1
.di6s5cru1c
.di6s5crú1c
.discrú1
.di5s4e2r1t
.dise1
.dise1r
.di5s4é2r1t
.disé1
.disé1r
.di2s1i2
.di2s1í2
.disi3c
.disí3c
.di2s1j
.di5s4pe1
.di2s1p
.di5s4pé1
.di6s5pe1n
.di6s5pé1n
.di6s5pe1r
.di6s5pé1r
.dispe4r5e1
.dispé4r5e1
.di1spe4r5i1
.di1spé4r5i1
.di7s6pe2r1s
.di7s6pé2r1s
.di7s6pe2r1g
.di7s6pé2r1g
.di5s4pi1
.di5s4pí1
.di5s4ta1
.di4s1t
.di5s4tá1
.di5s4ti1n
.di1sti1
.di5s4tí1n
.distí1
.di6s5tine1
.di6s5tíne1
.di5s4ti1r
.di5s4tí1r
.di5s4to.
.disto1
.di5s4tri1c
.dist4r
.di1stri1
.di5s4trí1c
.distrí1
.di5s4tri1n
.di5s4trí1n
.di3u1
.di3ú1
.ele2ut2h4
.e1
.e1l
.ele1
.eleu1
.eleu1t
.elé2ut2h4
.elé1
.eléu1
.eléu1t
.e2t3e1n
.e1t
.ete1
.é2t3e1n
.é1
.é1t
.éte1
.e2t3i3a1m
.eti1
.etia1
.é2t3i3a1m
.éti1
.étia1
.e2t3i3á1m
.etiá1
.e4u1
.e5ú1
.é4u1
.e5u1m
.e5ú1m
.e5u1n
.e5ú1n
.e6u1nu1
.e6únu1
.e5u4s.
.eu1s
.e2x3
.é2x3
.e3x4e1d
.e1xe1
.é3x4e1d
.éxe1
.e3x4é1d
.exé1
.e3x4ege1t
.exe1g
.exege1
.e3x4egé1t
.exegé1
.e3x4o1d
.exo1
.é3x4o1d
.éxo1
.e3x4ó1d
.exó1
.e3x4o2r1c
.exo1r
.ex5s4c
.ex1s
.éx5s4c
.éx1s
.ex2s2p
.éx2s2p
.ex5s2t
.éx5s2t
.1f2
.1g2
.1h2
.haru3s4p
.ha1
.ha1r
.haru1
.haru1s
.harú3s4p
.harú1
.harú1s
.he3i.
.he1
.hei1
.he3u.
.heu1
.hi2e1
.hi1
.hi2é1
.hu2c5u4s
.hu1
.hu1c
.hu1cu3
.hu1i2u1
.hui1
.hu1i2ú1
.i4a1
.i1
.i4á1
.iai2u1
.iai1
.i3bi1
.i1b
.i3bí1
.i3bo1
.i3bó1
.i3bu1
.i3bú1
.i3co1
.i1c
.i3có1
.i2d1
.i2dci1
.i2d1c
.i3d2e1
.i3d2é1
.í3d2e1
.í1
.í1d
.i4d3e1m
.i5de1n
.i4d3eo.
.ideo1
.í4d3eo.
.ídeo1
.i4d3eoq
.i4d3eóq
.ideó1
.i4d3e1s
.i3d2i1b
.i1di1
.i3di2o1g
.idio1
.i3d2o1l
.ido1
.i3d2ó1l
.idó1
.i3d2o1n
.i3d2ó1n
.i3d2u1s
.idu1
.i2e1
.i2é1
.iei2u1
.iei1
.i3i1
.i3í1
.í5i1
.i4n3
.í4n3
.ina2b3r
.ina1
.ina1b
.ina2b3s2
.ina2c6r
.ina1c
.ina2d1f
.ina1d
.i3n2a1n
.i3n2á1n
.iná1
.incircu4m
.i2n1c
.inci1
.inci1r
.in1ci2r1c
.incircu3
.in4d3e1p
.i4n1d
.inde1
.in4d3é1p
.indé1
.in4d3i1g
.i1ndi1
.ín4d3i1g
.í4n1d
.índi1
.i1n5d4ig2n
.i1n5d4íg2n
.indí1
.indí1g
.in4d3ipi1s
.indi1p
.indipi1
.in4d3ipí1s
.indipí1
.in5d4i1s
.in4d3u1
.ín4d3u1
.in4d3ú1
.in5d4u1c
.in5d4ú1c
.in5d4u1l
.in5d4ú1l
.in5d4u1m
.in5d4ú1m
.in5d4u1s
.in5d4ú1s
.in5d4u1x
.in5d4ú1x
.i3n2e2r1s
.ine1
.ine1r
.i3n2e2r1t
.ine2x3
.inex4s2t
.inex1s
.infra3s4
.i2n1f
.inf2r
.infra1
.ini2e1
.i1ni1
.ini2é1
.ini2í1
.i3n2i1t
.ini2u1
.ini2ú1
.ino2b3
.ino1
.ino3b2oe1
.inobo1
.ino2b3œ1
.inob3s2c
.ino2b1s
.inpe2r3iu1r
.i2n1p
.inpe1
.inpe1r
.inperi1
.inperiu1
.in3s4c6r
.i2n1s
.in2s1c
.in3s2p
.in5s2t
.ín5s2t
.í2n1s
.inte2r3e1
.i2n1t
.inte1
.inte1r
.inte2r3é1
.inté2r3e1
.inté1
.inté1r
.inte3r4e1m
.inte3r4é1m
.i1nte3r4e1n
.i1nte3r4é1n
.inte3r4e1r
.inté3r4e1r
.inte3r4é1r
.inte3r4e1s
.inte4r5e4s1s
.in1te3r4e1t
.in1te3r4é1t
.i1nte2r3i1
.inte2r3í1
.i1nté2r3i1
.ínte2r3i1
.í2n1t
.ínte1
.ínte1r
.interi2a1
.interi2á1
.inte1ri2e1
.inte1rí5e1
.interi2é1
.i1nteri2i1
.interi2í1
.inte3r4i3o1r
.interio1
.inte3r4i3ó1r
.interió1
.inté3r4i3o1r
.intério1
.interi2u1
.interi2ú1
.inte3r4i3u4s.
.interiu1s
.inté3r4i3u4s.
.intériu1
.intériu1s
.inte2r3s4pe1
.inte2r1s
.inter2s1p
.inte2r3s4pé1
.intro3i3e1
.int4r
.intro1
.i1ntroi1
.intro3i3é1
.intro3s4p
.intro1s
.inu2a1
.inu1
.inu2e1
.i1nu2i1
.i3n2u1l
.i4n3u2l1c
.inu2o1
.inu2u1
.i2o1
.i2ó1
.i4u1
.i4ú1
.iu2s3i2u1r
.iu1s
.iusi1
.iusiu1
.1j2
.1l2
.la4u1
.la1
.lec1ti5s4t
.le1
.le1c
.le2c1t
.lecti1
.lecti1s
.lo1n2g1a1n
.lo1
.lo1n
.lo2n1g
.longa1
.lo1n2g1á1n
.longá1
.lu4x3q
.lu1
.lu1x
.lu3x2u1
.lu3x2ú1
.1m2
.mai4u1
.ma1
.mai1
.1n2
.ne2c1o1p
.ne1
.ne1c
.neco1
.ne2c1ó1p
.necó1
.ne2g1o1t
.ne1g
.nego1
.ne2g1ó1t
.negó1
.ne2u.
.neu1
.ne2u1t
.né2u1t
.né1
.néu1
.o2b1
.o1
.ó2b1
.ó1
.o3b2e1d
.obe1
.o3b2é1d
.obé1
.o3b2e1l
.o3b2e1s
.obi2a1
.obi1
.o3b2i1c
.o4b3i1ci1
.obi2e1
.obi2é1
.obi3e1r
.o3b2i1g
.ob3i4i1
.ob3i4í1
.ob3i2u1
.ob3i2ú1
.ob3l
.ób3l
.o4b3œ1
.ob3r
.ób3r
.ób3ru1
.o3b4ru1z
.obru1
.ob3s2c
.o2b1s
.ob3s2cu3
.ob5s2t
.ób5s2t
.ó2b1s
.ob3t4r
.o2b1t
.obu2a1
.obu1
.obu2e1
.obu2i1
.o1bu2o1
.1p2
.pæ2n3i2n1s
.pæ1
.pæ1n
.pæni1
.pæni1n
.pæ2n3í2n1s
.pæní1
.pæní1n
.para1i1
.pa1
.pa1r
.pa1ra1
.para2u1
.pe1i6o1r
.pe1
.pei4o1
.pei1
.pe1i6ó1r
.peió1
.pe2r1absu1
.pe1r
.pera1
.pera1b
.pera2b1s
.pe2r1a1c
.pe2r1á1c
.perá1
.1pe2r1a2d1p
.pera1d
.pe2r1a2d1u1
.pe2r1ae1
.pe2r3a1g
.pe2r3á1g
.pé2r3a1g
.pé1
.pé1r
.péra1
.pe2r1a1ma1
.pera1m
.pe2r1amá1
.pe2r1a2m1b
.pe2r1á2m1b
.perá1m
.pe4r3a2n1t
.pera1n
.pe2r1a1r
.pe2r1á1r
.pe2r1a2u1
.pe2r1coq
.pe2r1c
.perco1
.pe2r1cu3
.pe2r3ea1
.pe1re1
.pe2r3eá1m
.pereá1
.pé2r3ea1m
.pére1
.pérea1
.pé2r3ea2n1t
.pérea1n
.pe2r3eá1t
.pé2r3ea1t
.pe2r3ea1s
.pé2r3ea1s
.pe4r3e1c
.pe4r1e1d
.pe2r1e2f1f
.pere1f
.pe2r3é1g
.peré1
.pe6r3eg2r
.pere1g
.pé6r3eg2r
.pére1g
.pe2r1e1l
.pe2r1e1m
.pe2r1é1m
.pe4r5e4n1d
.pere1n
.pe4r5é4n1d
.peré1n
.pe4r3e2n1n
.pe4r3é2n1n
.pe2r3eo1
.pé2r3eo1
.pe4r3e4r3r
.pe1re1r
.pe4r3é4r3r
.peré1r
.pe2r1eru1
.pe2r3e4s.
.pere1s
.pe2r3eu1
.pe2r3e5ú1
.pé2r3eu1
.pe4r1e2x3
.pe2r3h
.pé2r3h
.pe2r3i1
.pe2r3í1
.pe3r4ia1
.pe3r4iá1
.pe2r1i2a1c
.pe3r4ia1n
.pe2r3i1b
.pe2r3í1b
.pe3r4ic4l
.peri1c
.pe3r4íc4l
.perí1c
.pe3r4icu3
.pe3r4ícu3
.pe2r3ie1
.pe2r3í5e1
.pe2r3ié1
.pe3r4ie1b
.pe3r4ié1b
.pe3r4ie1m
.pe3r4ié1m
.pe3r4ie1n
.pe3r4ié1n
.pe4r5ie2n1s
.pé4r5ie2n1s
.péri1
.périe1
.périe1n
.pe3r4ie1r
.pe3r4íe1r
.pe3r4ié1r
.pe4r5iera1
.pé4r5iera1
.pé1rie1r
.pe4r5íera1
.pe5r6iera1t
.pé5r6iera1t
.pe5r6íera1t
.peri1e3i1
.pe3r4ie1t
.pe3r4ié1t
.peri1é3i1
.períe3i1
.pe2r1i2e1c
.pé2r3i1i1
.per5ii1t
.perii1
.pér5ii1t
.pe4r3i1m
.pe4r3í1m
.pé4r3i1m
.pe5r4i1mi1
.pe5r4ími1
.pe5r4imu1
.pe5r4ímu1
.pe6r5imu1s
.pe6r5ímu1s
.pe2r3i1n
.pe2r3í1n
.pe3r4i2n1t
.pe3r4í2n1t
.pe3r4io1
.pe3r4io1d
.pe3r4ió1d
.perió1
.peri3p2s
.1peri1p
.peri4p3t
.pe2r3i1r
.pe2r3í1r
.pe3r4i1remu1r
.pe1rire1
.perire1m
.periremu1
.pe3r4i1rému1r
.periré1
.periré1m
.perirému1
.pe3r4i1remi1
.pe3r4i1rémi1
.pe3r4i1rentu1r
.perire1n
.perire2n1t
.perirentu1
.pe3r4i1réntu1r
.periré1n
.periré2n1t
.periréntu1
.pe3r4i1re1r
.pe3r4i1ré1r
.pe3r4í1re1r
.períre1
.pe3r4ire1t
.pe3r4iré1t
.pe4r5ir2e4t.
.pe4r5ireti1s
.perireti1
.pe4r5iréti1s
.periréti1
.pe3r4i1ri1
.pe3r4íri1
.pe3r4i3s2c
.peri1s
.pe3r4í3s2c
.perí1s
.peri4s2t
.pe3r4i1t
.pe3r4í1t
.pe4r5itú1r
.peritú1
.pe4r5itu1r
.peritu1
.pe4r5ítu1r
.perítu1
.pe4r5i4t.
.pe4r5itote1
.perito1
.perito1t
.pe4r5itóte1
.peritó1
.peritó1t
.pe2r3i4u1
.pe2r3i4ú1
.pe3r4i5u1n
.pe3r4i5ú1n
.pe4r3j
.pé4r3j
.pe2r1o2b3s2c
.pero1
.pero1b
.pero2b1s
.pe2r1o1d
.pe2r1o1f
.pe2r1o1l
.1pe2r1o1p
.pe4r3o1r
.pe4r3ó1r
.peró1
.pe2r3re1g
.pe4r3r
.perre1
.pe2r3s2c
.pe2r1s
.1pe2r3s2p
.pe2r7s2t
.pé2r7s2t
.pé2r1s
.pe2r3tra2n2s1
.pe2r1t
.pe1rt4r
.pertra1
.pertra1n
.pe2r3trá2n2s1
.pertrá1
.pertrá1n
.pe2r3u1
.pe2r3ú1
.pe2r1u2a1
.pe2r1u2e1
.pe2r1u2i1
.pe3r4u1l
.pe3r4ú1l
.pe2r1u2o1
.3p2ne4u1
.2p1n
.pne1
.po3e1t
.po1
.poe1
.pos4t3ea1
.po1s
.po4s1t
.poste1
.pos4t3eá1
.pós4t3ea1
.pó1
.pó1s
.pó4s1t
.póste1
.pos4t3e1r
.pos4t3é1r
.posté1
.pós4t3e1r
.pos4t3h4
.po4s4t3ha1c
.postha1
.pos4t3i1l
.posti1
.pos4t3í1l
.postí1
.posu3í1
.posu1
.pósu3i1
.pósu1
.po2t3e1
.po1t
.po2t3é1
.pó2t3e1
.pó1t
.præ1
.p2r
.præ3a2u1
.præ3a1
.præ3e1s
.præ3e1
.præi4a1
.præ3i1
.præi4á1
.præi4e1c
.præie1
.præi4o1
.præi4i1
.præi4í1
.præi4u1
.præi4ú1
.præ3s2c
.præ1s
.1præ3s2p
.præ5s2t
.p1ræte2r1
.præ1t
.præte1
.p1ræté2r1
.præté1
.pri1mi1
.pri1
.pri1m
.primi3s2c
.primi1s
.pro2d1ea1
.pro1
.pro1d
.prode1
.pró2d1ea1
.pró1
.pró1d
.próde1
.pro1de1a2m1b
.prodea1m
.pro2d1eo1
.pró2d1eo1
.pro2d1e4s3s
.prode1s
.pro2d1é4s3s
.prodé1
.prodé1s
.pro2d1eu1n
.prodeu1
.pro2d1fu2
.pro2d1f
.pro2d1i1b
.prodi1
.pro3d2i3d
.pro3d2í3d
.prodí1
.pro2d1ie1n
.prodie1
.pro2d1ié1n
.prodié1
.pró2d1ie1n
.pródi1
.pródie1
.p1ro2d1ie1r
.p1ro2d1ié1r
.p1ró2d1ie1r
.pro2d1i1g
.pro2d1í1g
.pró2d1i1g
.pro2d3i5i.
.prodii1
.pró2d3i5i.
.pródii1
.pro2d1i1m
.p1ro2d1i1r
.p1ro2d1í1r
.pro2d3i1s
.pro2d3í1s
.pro2d5i1t
.pro2d5í1t
.pro3d6i1ti1
.pro3d6íti1
.pro3d6ito1
.pro3d6íto1
.p1ro3d6it4r
.pro3g2n
.pro1g
.pro3i4e1
.proi1
.pro3i4é1
.pro3i4i1
.pro3i4í1
.pró3i4i1
.prói1
.pro3i1n
.p1ropte2r3
.1pro1p
.pro4p3t
.propte1
.p1ropté2r3
.propté1
.pro3s2c
.pro1s
.1pro3s2p
.1pró3s2p
.pró1s
.pro5s2t
